Hawaii, session 2025, HB350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 196-6.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title and subsection (a) to read as follows: "§196-6.5  [Solar water] Water heater system [required] requirements for new single-family residential construction.  (a) On or after January 1, 2010, no building permit shall be issued for a new single-family dwelling that does not include a solar water heater system that meets the standards established pursuant to section 269-44[,] or an ENERGY STAR certified heat pump water heater, unless the chief energy officer of the Hawaii state energy office approves a variance.  A variance application shall only be accepted if submitted by an architect or mechanical engineer licensed under chapter 464, who attests that: (1)  [Installation] For a solar water heater system, installation is impracticable due to poor solar resource[;] and for a heat pump water heater, installation is impracticable due to interior or exterior space constraints; (2)  Installation of either a solar water heater system or a heat pump water heater is cost-prohibitive based upon a life cycle cost-benefit analysis that incorporates the average residential utility bill and the cost of the new solar water heater system [with a life cycle that does not exceed fifteen years;] or new heat pump water heater; (3)  A renewable energy technology system, as defined in section 235-12.5, is substituted for use as the primary energy source for heating water; or (4)  [A] An ENERGY STAR certified demand water heater device [approved by Underwriters Laboratories, Inc.,] is installed; provided that at least one other gas appliance is installed in the dwelling[.] and a life cycle cost-benefit analysis justifies the variance.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "demand water heater" means a gas-tankless instantaneous water heater that provides hot water only as it is needed. For the purposes of this subsection, "heat pump water heater" means a water heater that uses electricity to move heat from one place to another instead of generating heat directly." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________